Vermont, session 2025-2026, H544.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 13 V.S.A. § 4822 is amended to read:
§ 4822. FINDINGS AND ORDER; PERSONS WITH A MENTAL ILLNESS
* * *
(c)(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b) of this section, at
least 10 days prior to the proposed discharge of any person committed under
this section, the Commissioner of Mental Health shall give notice of the
VT LEG #385442 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.544
2026 Page 2 of 7
discharge to the committing court and State’s Attorney of the county where the
prosecution originated. In all cases requiring a hearing prior to discharge of a
person found incompetent to stand trial under section 4817 of this title, the
hearing shall be conducted by the committing court issuing the order under that
section. In all other cases, when the committing court orders a hearing under
subsection (a) of this section or when, in the discretion of the Commissioner of
Mental Health, a hearing should be held prior to the discharge, the hearing
shall be held in the Family Division of the Superior Court to determine if the
committed person is no longer a person in need of treatment or a patient in
need of further treatment as set forth in subsection (a) of this section. Notice
of the hearing shall be given to the Commissioner, the State’s Attorney of the
county where the prosecution originated, the committed person, and the
person’s attorney. Prior to the hearing, the State’s Attorney may enter an
appearance in the proceedings and may request examination of the patient by
an independent psychiatrist, who may testify at the hearing.
(2)(A) This subdivision (2) shall apply when a person is committed to
the care and custody of the Commissioner of Mental Health under this section
after having been found:
(i) not guilty by reason of insanity; or
(ii) incompetent to stand trial, provided that the person’s criminal
case has not been dismissed.
VT LEG #385442 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.544
2026 Page 3 of 7
(B)(i) When a person has been committed under this section, the
Commissioner shall provide notice to the State’s Attorney of the county where
the prosecution originated or to the Office of the Attorney General if that office
prosecuted the case:
(I) at least 10 days prior to discharging the person from:
(aa) the care and custody of the Commissioner; or
(bb) a hospital or a secure residential recovery facility to the
community on an order of nonhospitalization pursuant to 18 V.S.A. § 7618;
(II) at least 10 days prior to the expiration of a commitment
order issued under this section if the Commissioner does not seek continued
treatment; or
(III) any time that the person elopes from the custody of the
Commissioner.
(ii) When the State’s Attorney or Attorney General receives notice
under subdivision (i) of this subdivision (B), the Office shall provide notice of
the action to any victim of the offense for which the person has been charged
who has not opted out of receiving notice. A victim receiving notice pursuant
to this subdivision (ii) has the right to submit a victim impact statement to the
Family Division of the Superior Court in writing or through the State’s
Attorney or Attorney General’s office.
VT LEG #385442 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.544
2026 Page 4 of 7
(iii) During the period in which the Commissioner gives notice of
the pending discharge pursuant to subdivision (i) of this subdivision (B) and
the anticipated date of discharge, which shall not be less than 10 days, the
State’s Attorney or the Office of the Attorney General if that office prosecuted
the case, or the victim, may request a hearing in the Family Division of the
Superior Court on whether the person’s pending discharge is appropriate,
which shall be held within 10 days after the request. The pending discharge
shall be stayed until the hearing has concluded and any subsequent orders are
issued, but in no event shall a subsequent order be issued more than five days
after the hearing.
(iv) As used in this subdivision (B), “victim” has the same
meaning as in section 5301 of this title.
(d) The court may continue the hearing provided in subsection (c) of this
section for a period of 15 additional days upon a showing of good cause.
(e) If the court determines that commitment shall no longer be necessary, it
shall issue an order discharging the patient from the custody of the Department
of Mental Health.
(f) The court shall issue its findings and order not later than 15 days from
the date of hearing.
VT LEG #385442 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.544
2026 Page 5 of 7
Sec. 2. 18 V.S.A. § 8847 is amended to read:
§ 8847. DISCHARGE FROM COMMITMENT
(a) A person committed under 13 V.S.A. § 4823 or this subchapter may be
discharged as follows:
(1) by a Family Division Superior Court judge after review of an order
of custody, care, and habilitation or an order of continued custody, care, and
habilitation if the court finds that a person is not a person in need of custody,
care, and habilitation or continued custody, care, and habilitation, respectively;
or
(2) by administrative order of the Commissioner regarding an order of
custody, care, and habilitation or an order of continued custody, care, and
habilitation if the Commissioner determines that a person is no longer a person
in need of custody, care, and habilitation or continued custody, care, and
habilitation, respectively.
(b) A judicial or administrative order of discharge may be conditional or
absolute.
(c)(1) When a person is under an order of commitment pursuant to 13
V.S.A. § 4823 or continued commitment pursuant to this subchapter, the
Commissioner shall provide notice to the State’s Attorney of the county where
the prosecution originated or to the Office of the Attorney General if that
Office prosecuted the case:
VT LEG #385442 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.544
2026 Page 6 of 7
(A) at least 10 days prior to discharging a person from commitment
or continued commitment;
(B) at least 10 days prior to the expiration of a commitment or
continued commitment order if the Commissioner does not seek an order of
continued custody, care, and habilitation; or
(C) any time that the person elopes from custody of the
Commissioner and cannot be located, and there is reason to believe the person
may be lost or poses a risk of harm to others.
(2) When the State’s Attorney or Attorney General receives notice under
subdivision (1) of this subsection, the Office shall provide notice of the action
to any victim of the offense for which the person has been charged who has not
opted out of receiving notice. A victim receiving notice pursuant to this
subdivision has the right to submit a victim impact statement to the Family
Division of the Superior Court in writing or through the State’s Attorney’s or
Attorney General’s Office.
(3) During the period in which the Commissioner gives notice of the
pending discharge pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection and the
anticipated date of discharge, which shall not be less than 10 days, the State’s
Attorney or the Office of the Attorney General if that office prosecuted the
case, or the victim, may request a hearing in the Family Division of the
Superior Court on whether the person’s pending discharge is appropriate,
VT LEG #385442 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.544
2026 Page 7 of 7
which shall be held within 10 days after the request. The pending discharge
shall be stayed until the hearing has concluded and any subsequent orders are
issued, but in no event shall a subsequent order be issued more than five days
after the hearing.
* * *
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #385442 v.1